Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2005
Community college gap assistance; criteria; denial of application; when.

(1) An applicant for community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program shall demonstrate capacity to achieve the following outcomes:

(a) The ability to be accepted to and complete an eligible program;

(b) The ability to be accepted into and complete a postsecondary certificate, diploma, or degree program for credit;

(c) The ability to obtain full-time employment; and

(d) The ability to maintain full-time employment over time.

(2) The committee may grant community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program to an applicant in any amount up to the full amount of eligible costs.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the committee shall deny an application when the community college or other eligible institution receiving the application determines that funding for the total eligible cost as defined in section 85-2006 for an applicant's participation in an eligible program is available from any other public or private funding source. The committee shall not consider any benefit available to an applicant pursuant to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training program administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to 7 C.F.R. 273.7, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2026, when determining an applicant's eligibility for community college gap assistance.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 31;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 60;

Laws 2026, LB1086, § 1.
April 15, 2026
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program employment and training program, see section 68-1017.02.